Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.230

Tax Reform Act of 1969, state implementation—Rights, powers, of courts, attorney general, not impaired.

Nothing in RCW 11.110.200 through 11.110.260 shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the attorney general of this state with respect to any trust.

[ 1985 c 30 s 132. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 164; 1971 c 58 s 4. Formerly RCW 19.10.230.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.